Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,261
Windshield and windows; funeral vehicles; exception.

Sections 60-6,257 to 60-6,259 shall not apply to the side or rear windows of funeral coaches, hearses, or other vehicles operated in the normal course of business by a funeral establishment licensed under section 38-1419.

Laws 1989, LB 155, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,136.05;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 357;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1175.